src/chrome/test/data/convert_dict/prefix-suffix.aff
# This file describes two rules for an affix class named VERB:
# * Words in affix class VERB can be prefixed with "re"
# * Words in affix class VERB can be suffixed with:
#    * "ed" if they do not end in "y"
#    * "ied", deleting the trailing y, if they do end in "y"

# Define the affix class we're going to use:
AF 1
AF VERB

# The fields of PFX and SFX are either:
#    ?FX <class> <cross> <count>
# or ?FX <class> <remove> <add> <match> [...]
# where the ? may be either P (for prefix) or S (for suffix).
# The first type of line is a header, which describes how many of this type of
# ?FX there are for this class. The second type of line describes how to
# construct a new word using this affix:
#   For words in <class>, if they end in <match>, you can remove <remove> from
#   the end being considered, then add <add> at that end.
# Where the end being considered is the beginning for PFX and the end for SFX.
# The meaning of <cross> and of the trailing stuff that is allowed in the second
# type of line (the morphology) is obscure to me (ellyjones@).
PFX VERB Y  1
PFX VERB 0 re .

SFX VERB Y   2
SFX VERB 0  ed [^y]
SFX VERB y ied y
